Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201819-5308
Taxation.

The real property owned by an authority and the authority’s income and operations are exempt from all taxation by the state or any political subdivision thereof, except that purchases by an authority shall be subject to state and local sales and use taxes.

Laws 2017, LB97, § 8.